Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.440

Production and distribution of biodiesel, ethanol, and ethanol blend fuels—Crop purchase contracts for dedicated energy crops.

In addition to any other authority provided by law, municipal utilities are authorized to produce and distribute biodiesel, ethanol, and ethanol blend fuels, including entering into crop purchase contracts for a dedicated energy crop for the purpose of generating electricity or producing biodiesel produced from Washington feedstocks, cellulosic ethanol, and cellulosic ethanol blend fuels for use in internal operations of the electric utility and for sale or distribution.

[ 2007 c 348 s 209.]

NOTES:

Findings—2007 c 348: See RCW 43.325.005.